Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0616

Voting.

(1) Each director shall have one vote for purposes of decisions made by the board of directors.

(2) Unless the organic rules provide for a greater number, the affirmative vote of a majority of directors present at a meeting is required for action by the board of directors.

[ 2019 c 37 s 616.]